Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4715
Investments.

The funds of a prepaid limited health service organization shall be invested only in cash, certificates of deposit, or obligations of a state or of the United States.

Laws 1989, LB 320, § 15.